Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-617
Construction; resolution; notice.

Whenever the governing body of any city or village within the state believes the construction of a viaduct over or subway under the track or tracks of any railroad within its corporate limits is necessary for the public safety, convenience, and welfare, it shall pass a resolution so declaring. Thereafter such governing body shall publish a notice of the passage of said resolution six consecutive days in a newspaper published or of general circulation in said city or village or, if there be no such daily newspaper, then two consecutive weeks in a weekly newspaper published or of general circulation therein. The notice of the passage of said resolution, published as aforesaid, shall include an exact copy of same.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 1, p. 103.